Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 98. Veterinarians.

Administrative Code. —

For board of veterinary examiners, see 12 AAC 68.

Collateral references. —

78 Am. Jur. 2d, Veterinarians, §§ 1-5.

Validity, construction, and effect of statutes or regulations governing practice of veterinary medicine,
8 ALR4th 223.

Veterinarian’s liability for malpractice, 71 ALR4th 811.